Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 7. Rural Development Initiative Fund.

Administrative Code. —

For rural development initiative fund, see 3 AAC 99, art. 9.

Sec. 44.88.600.
Rural development initiative fund.

The rural development initiative fund is created in the authority outside of the revolving fund. The rural development initiative fund is a fund for the uses and purposes of AS

44.88.600

—

44.88.620

. The rural development initiative fund consists of money or assets appropriated or transferred to the authority for the purposes of this section, and of loan repayments, interest, or other income earned on loans or investments of the fund. In addition, the authority may deposit other assets into the fund if the total value of those deposits does not exceed $2,000,000. The authority, in its discretion, may transfer money or other assets from the rural development initiative fund to the revolving fund.

History.

(§ 11 ch 117 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For rural development initiative fund, see 3 AAC 99, art. 9.

Sec. 44.88.610.
Rural development loans.

The authority may use money from the rural development initiative fund to make loans of up to $150,000 to a person, or loans of up to $300,000 to two or more persons, to be used for working capital, equipment, construction, or other commercial purposes by a business located in a community with a population of 5,000 or less that is not connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks, or with a population of 2,000 or less that is connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks. For purposes of this subsection,

“community” means a city as defined in AS

29.71.800

or a place in the unorganized borough that is not incorporated as a city and in which 25 or more individuals reside as a social unit; and

“connected by road” does not include a connection by the Alaska marine highway system.

The authority shall require collateral for each loan made under this section and shall require that a reasonable amount of money from other nonstate sources be committed for use on any project or enterprise for which money from a loan will be used. The authority by regulation may establish other conditions for loans. The authority shall by regulation establish rates of interest that are not less than four percent a year and terms of repayment for loans made under this section.

History.

(§ 11 ch 117 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 121 SLA 2002; am § 13 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 5 ch 69 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For rural development initiative fund, see 3 AAC 99, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective April 9, 2008, rewrote paragraph (a)(1).

The 2010 amendment, effective September 9, 2010, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “loans of up to $150,000” for “a loan of up to $100,000” and “loans of up to $300,000” for “a loan of up to $200,000”, deleted the second sentence, which read, “A person who has received a loan under this subsection may not be granted another loan until after the original loan is entirely repaid.”; in (b), substituted “not less than four percent a year” for “not less than six percent a year” in the third sentence.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 69, SLA 2010 (SB 300), proposing amendments to subsection (a) of this section to modify limitations on use of the Authority’s rural development initiative fund, see 2010 Senate Journal 1661 — 1663.

Sec. 44.88.620.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

The authority shall dispose of property acquired through default or foreclosure of a loan made from the rural development initiative fund. Disposal shall be made in a competitive manner that serves the best interests of the state, and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years. Proceeds from the disposal of property under this section shall be deposited into the fund.

History.

(§ 11 ch 117 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For rural development initiative fund, see 3 AAC 99, art. 9.